Washington statutes.
RCW 26.60.025

Definition—Domestic partnership.

Whenever the term "domestic partnership" is used in the Revised Code of Washington it shall be defined to mean "state registered domestic partnership" and whenever the term "domestic partner" is used in the Revised Code of Washington it shall be defined to mean "state registered domestic partner."

[ 2008 c 6 s 1201.]